Utah statutes.
77-8-2.   Suspect's right to have attorney present.
A suspect has the right to have his attorney present at any lineup. The
magistrate or party in charge of the lineup shall notify the suspect of this
right. Every suspect unable to employ counsel shall be entitled to
representation by an attorney appointed by a magistrate for a lineup either
before or after an arrest.
